Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 2. Artisan’s Liens

§ 1951.
Artisan’s lien.

A person who makes, alters, launders, dry cleans, or repairs an article of personal property, at the request of the owner, shall have a lien thereon for his or her reasonable charges and may retain possession of the property until the same are paid.

§ 1952.
Enforcement by sale.

When the debt secured thereby remains unpaid for three months after such lien attaches, the person having such lien, except as provided in section 1954 of this title, may sell such property at public auction in the town where such lien accrues.
Notice of the time, place, and purpose of such sale shall be posted in two or more public places in such town at least 10 days prior thereto, and he or she may apply the proceeds of such sale to the satisfaction of the debt due him or her and the expenses of such sale.
The surplus remaining shall be paid to the proper owner thereof within 10 days thereafter, or deposited for his or her benefit in the treasury of the town where the sale occurs.

§ 1953.
Notice of sale.

At least 10 days prior thereto, notice in writing of the time and place of such sale and of the amount claimed to be due shall be given to the owner of such property, either personally, by mail, or by leaving the same at his or her place of abode, if a resident of this State.
Otherwise such notice shall be given by publication thereof in some newspaper published in the town or county where such lien accrues, if there is one, and if not, by publication in a newspaper published in an adjoining county.

§ 1954.
Price in dispute; tender by owner.

When the owner of such article of personal property desires to question the reasonableness of such charges, he or she may within such three months make tender therefor, and the person having such lien shall bring a civil action within 30 days after such tender to determine the amount due if he or she does not elect to accept such tender.
The defendant may give evidence of the tender under the general denial and, on proof thereof, if the plaintiff does not recover a greater sum than the amount tendered, the defendant shall recover his or her costs.
In case tender is made as above provided and an action is not brought by the person having such lien, such lien shall terminate 30 days from the time of such tender.
The foregoing provisions shall not be construed as exclusive of any other remedies that the parties now have by law.